Massachusetts, session 194th, H2863.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 100A of Chapter 32 of the Massachusetts General Laws shall be amended by
inserting the words "or Unit 8 employees within the Public Safety Secretariat" after the words
"or corrections officer" in section (c) line 3, and section (d) line 6, line 7, line 9, line 11, and line
12.
of 1